Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF25.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TITLE.new text end new text begin This act shall be known as the "Supporting Women Act." new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [145.909] GRANT PROGRAM FOR WOMEN'S PREGNANCY CENTERS AND MATERNITY HOMES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin (c) "Maternity home" means a community-based, supervised group housing setting that provides housing, information, referrals, and support to: new text end new text begin (1) women who: new text end new text begin (i) are pregnant or recently gave birth; and new text end new text begin (ii) are in crisis, are homeless, or are at risk of homelessness; and new text end new text begin (2) the children of women who meet the criteria in clause (1). new text end new text begin (d) "Women's pregnancy center" means an organization that provides information, referrals, and support to encourage and assist pregnant women in carrying their pregnancies to term and in caring for their children after birth. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grant program established. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall administer a program to provide grants to maternity homes and women's pregnancy centers to fund housing, services, and assistance to help pregnant women in carrying their pregnancies to term and in caring for their children after birth. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligibility for grants. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible for a grant under this section, a women's pregnancy center or maternity home must: new text end new text begin (1) be a nonprofit organization; new text end new text begin (2) offer programs and services, or referrals for programs and services, to pregnant women and women who recently gave birth to support, encourage, and assist them in carrying their pregnancies to term and in caring for their children after birth; new text end new text begin (3) provide programs or services free of charge or at reduced cost, except that any housing provided must be provided free of charge; and new text end new text begin (4) not use any grant funds to: new text end new text begin (i) encourage or counsel women to have an abortion that is not necessary to prevent the woman's death; new text end new text begin (ii) provide abortions; or new text end new text begin (iii) directly refer women to an abortion provider for an abortion. new text end new text begin (b) An organization is not eligible for a grant under this section if the organization: new text end new text begin (1) provides abortions, promotes abortions, or directly refers women to an abortion provider for an abortion; or new text end new text begin (2) is an affiliate of an organization that engages in any of the acts in clause (1), unless the two organizations are separately incorporated and independent of each other. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Uses of grant funds. new text end new text begin (a) A women's pregnancy center receiving a grant under this section must use the grant funds for programs and services to support, encourage, and assist pregnant women in carrying their pregnancies to term and in caring for their children after birth. new text end new text begin (b) A maternity home receiving a grant under this section must use the grant funds for housing, supervision, and programs and services to support, encourage, and assist pregnant women in carrying their pregnancies to term and in caring for their children after birth. new text end new text begin (c) A women's pregnancy center or maternity home may provide programs and services directly or may refer women to other organizations for programs and services. Programs and services to support, encourage, and assist pregnant women and women who recently gave birth may address medical care, information about the developmental characteristics of babies and unborn children, nutrition services, mental health care and treatment, substance use disorder treatment, housing assistance, adoption services, education and employment assistance, financial literacy, communication skills, child care assistance, and parenting education and support services. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Privacy protections. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c), a women's pregnancy center or maternity home receiving a grant under this section must have a privacy policy and procedures in place to ensure that the following information is not made public or shared with any other agency or organization without the woman's written consent: new text end new text begin (1) the woman's name, address, or telephone number, or other information that might identify a woman seeking or receiving services from the women's pregnancy center or maternity home; or new text end new text begin (2) communications between the women's pregnancy center or maternity home and a woman seeking or receiving services from the women's pregnancy center or maternity home. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of any medical care provided by the women's pregnancy center or maternity home, including but not limited to pregnancy tests or ultrasonic scanning, the women's pregnancy center or maternity home must comply with the requirements in sections 144.291 to 144.298 that apply to providers before releasing any information relating to the medical care provided. new text end new text begin (c) A women's pregnancy center or maternity home receiving a grant under this section must provide the commissioner with information requested by the commissioner for purposes of subdivision 6. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Monitoring and review. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) collect from grant recipients information necessary to evaluate and administer the grant program; and new text end new text begin (2) monitor and review each grant recipient's program to ensure compliance with this section. new text end new text begin (b) Any data on individuals receiving services from a women's pregnancy center or maternity home that are collected by the commissioner under paragraph (a) are classified as private data on individuals, as defined by section 13.02, subdivision 12. new text end Sec. 3. Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 20, section 3, subdivision 2, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 67, section 14, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Health Improvement Appropriations by Fund General 229,600,000 210,030,000 State Government Special Revenue 12,392,000 12,682,000 Health Care Access 49,051,000 53,290,000 Federal TANF 11,713,000 11,713,000 (a) Studies of telehealth expansion and payment parity. $1,200,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the general fund for studies of telehealth expansion and payment parity. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2025. (b) Advancing equity through capacity building and resource allocation grant program. $916,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $916,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.9821. This is a onetime appropriation. (c) Grant to Minnesota Community Health Worker Alliance. $971,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $971,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1462. (d) Community solutions for healthy child development grants. $2,730,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $2,730,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.9257. The base for this appropriation is $2,415,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,415,000 in fiscal year 2027. (e) Comprehensive Overdose and Morbidity Prevention Act. $9,794,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $10,458,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for comprehensive overdose and morbidity prevention strategies under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.0528. The base for this appropriation is $10,476,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $10,476,000 in fiscal year 2027. (f) Emergency preparedness and response. $10,486,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $14,314,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for public health emergency preparedness and response, the sustainability of the strategic stockpile, and COVID-19 pandemic response transition. The base for this appropriation is $11,438,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $11,362,000 in fiscal year 2027. (g) Healthy Beginnings, Healthy Families. (1) $8,440,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $7,305,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants under Minnesota Statutes, sections 145.9571 to 145.9576. The base for this appropriation is $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027. (2) Of the amount in clause (1), $400,000 in fiscal year 2024 is to support the transition from implementation of activities under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.4235, to implementation of activities under Minnesota Statutes, sections 145.9571 to 145.9576. The commissioner shall award four sole-source grants of $100,000 each to Face to Face, Cradle of Hope, Division of Indian Work, and Minnesota Prison Doula Project. The amount in this clause is a onetime appropriation. (h) Help Me Connect. $463,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $921,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for the Help Me Connect program under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.988. (i) Home visiting. $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for home visiting under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.87, to provide home visiting to priority populations under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.87, subdivision 1, paragraph (e). (j) No Surprises Act enforcement. $1,210,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $1,090,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for implementation of the federal No Surprises Act under Minnesota Statutes, section 62Q.021, and an assessment of the feasibility of a statewide provider directory. The general fund base for this appropriation is $855,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $855,000 in fiscal year 2027. (k) Office of African American Health. $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants under the authority of the Office of African American Health under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.0756. (l) Office of American Indian Health. $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants under the authority of the Office of American Indian Health under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.0757. (m) Public health system transformation grants. (1) $9,844,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $9,844,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 145A.131, subdivision 1, paragraph (f). (2) $535,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $535,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 145A.14, subdivision 2b. (3) $321,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $321,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.0759. (n) Health care workforce. (1) $1,010,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $2,550,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the health care access fund for rural training tracks and rural clinicals grants under Minnesota Statutes, sections 144.1505 and 144.1507. The base for this appropriation is $4,060,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,600,000 in fiscal year 2027. (2) $420,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $420,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the health care access fund for immigrant international medical graduate training grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1911. (3) $5,654,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $5,550,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the health care access fund for site-based clinical training grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1508. The base for this appropriation is $4,657,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,451,000 in fiscal year 2027. (4) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the health care access fund for mental health for health care professional grants. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (5) $502,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $502,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the health care access fund for workforce research and data analysis of shortages, maldistribution of health care providers in Minnesota, and the factors that influence decisions of health care providers to practice in rural areas of Minnesota. (o) School health. $800,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.903. The base for this appropriation is $2,300,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,300,000 in fiscal year 2027. (p) Long COVID. $3,146,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $3,146,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants and to implement Minnesota Statutes, section 145.361. (q) Workplace safety grants. $4,400,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the general fund for grants to health care entities to improve employee safety or security. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. The commissioner may use up to ten percent of this appropriation for administration. (r) Clinical dental education innovation grants. $1,122,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $1,122,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for clinical dental education innovation grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1913. (s) Emmett Louis Till Victims Recovery Program. $500,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the general fund for a grant to the Emmett Louis Till Victims Recovery Program. The commissioner must not use any of this appropriation for administration. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2025. (t) Center for health care affordability. $2,752,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $3,989,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund to establish a center for health care affordability and to implement Minnesota Statutes, section 62J.312. The general fund base for this appropriation is $3,988,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,988,000 in fiscal year 2027. (u) Federally qualified health centers apprenticeship program. $690,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $690,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.9272. (v) Alzheimer's public information program. $80,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $80,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants to community-based organizations to co-create culturally specific messages to targeted communities and to promote public awareness materials online through diverse media channels. (w) Nurse and Patient Safety Act. The appropriations in this paragraph are available until June 30, 2027. (1) $5,317,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $5,317,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for loan forgiveness under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1501, for eligible nurses who have agreed to work as hospital nurses in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1501, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (7). (2) $66,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $66,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for loan forgiveness under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1501, for eligible nurses who have agreed to teach in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1501, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (3). (x) Supporting healthy development of babies. $260,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $260,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for a grant to the Amherst H. Wilder Foundation for the African American Babies Coalition initiative. The base for this appropriation is $520,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $0 in fiscal year 2027. Any appropriation in fiscal year 2026 is available until June 30, 2027. This paragraph expires on June 30, 2027. (y) Health professional education loan forgiveness. $2,780,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the general fund for eligible mental health professional loan forgiveness under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1501. This is a onetime appropriation. The commissioner may use up to ten percent of this appropriation for administration. (z) Primary care residency expansion grant program. $400,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for a psychiatry resident under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1506. (aa) Pediatric primary care mental health training grant program. $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1509. The commissioner may use up to ten percent of this appropriation for administration. (bb) Mental health cultural community continuing education grant program. $500,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1511. The commissioner may use up to ten percent of this appropriation for administration. (cc) Labor trafficking services grant program. $500,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.3885. (dd) Palliative Care Advisory Council. $44,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $44,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for Minnesota Statutes, section 144.059. (ee) Analysis of a universal health care financing system. $1,815,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $580,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund to the commissioner to contract for an analysis of the benefits and costs of a legislative proposal for a universal health care financing system and a similar analysis of the current health care financing system. The base for this appropriation is $580,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $0 in fiscal year 2027. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. (ff) Charitable assets public interest review. (1) The appropriations under this paragraph are contingent upon legislative enactment of 2023 House File 402 by the 93rd Legislature. (2) $1,584,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $769,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund to review certain health care entity transactions; to conduct analyses of the impacts of health care transactions on health care cost, quality, and competition; and to issue public reports on health care transactions in Minnesota and their impacts. The base for this appropriation is $710,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $710,000 in fiscal year 2027. (gg) Study of the development of a statewide registry for provider orders for life-sustaining treatment. $225,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the general fund for a study of the development of a statewide registry for provider orders for life-sustaining treatment. This is a onetime appropriation. (hh) Task Force on Pregnancy Health and Substance Use Disorders. $199,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for the Task Force on Pregnancy Health and Substance Use Disorders. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2025. (ii) 988 Suicide and crisis lifeline. $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the general fund for 988 national suicide prevention lifeline grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.561. This is a onetime appropriation. (jj) Equitable Health Care Task Force. $779,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $749,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for the Equitable Health Care Task Force. This is a onetime appropriation. (kk) Psychedelic Medicine Task Force. $338,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $171,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for the Psychedelic Medicine Task Force. This is a onetime appropriation. (ll) Medical education and research costs. $300,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for the medical education and research costs program under Minnesota Statutes, section 62J.692. (mm) Special Guerilla Unit Veterans grant program. $250,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for a grant to the Special Guerrilla Units Veterans and Families of the United States of America to offer programming and culturally specific and specialized assistance to support the health and well-being of Special Guerilla Unit Veterans. The base for this appropriation is $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $0 in fiscal year 2027. Any amount appropriated in fiscal year 2026 is available until June 30, 2027. This paragraph expires June 30, 2027. (nn) Safe harbor regional navigator. $300,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 in fiscal year 2025 are for a regional navigator in northwestern Minnesota. The commissioner may use up to ten percent of this appropriation for administration. (oo) Network adequacy. $798,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $491,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the general fund for reviews of provider networks under Minnesota Statutes, section 62K.10, to determine network adequacy. (pp) Grant to Minnesota Alliance for Volunteer Advancement. $278,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the general fund for a grant to the Minnesota Alliance for Volunteer Advancement to administer needs-based volunteerism subgrants targeting underresourced nonprofit organizations in greater Minnesota. Subgrants must be used to support the ongoing efforts of selected organizations to address and minimize disparities in access to human services through increased volunteerism. Subgrant applicants must demonstrate that the populations to be served by the subgrantee are underserved or suffer from or are at risk of homelessness, hunger, poverty, lack of access to health care, or deficits in education. The Minnesota Alliance for Volunteer Advancement must give priority to organizations that are serving the needs of vulnerable populations. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2025. (qq) (1) TANF Appropriations. TANF funds must be used as follows: (i) $3,579,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $3,579,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the TANF fund for home visiting and nutritional services listed under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.882, subdivision 7, clauses (6) and (7). Funds must be distributed to community health boards according to Minnesota Statutes, section 145A.131, subdivision 1; (ii) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the TANF fund for decreasing racial and ethnic disparities in infant mortality rates under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.928, subdivision 7; (iii) $4,978,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $4,978,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the TANF fund for the family home visiting grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 145A.17. $4,000,000 of the funding in fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 must be distributed to community health boards under Minnesota Statutes, section 145A.131, subdivision 1. $978,000 of the funding in fiscal year 2024 and $978,000 in fiscal year 2025 must be distributed to Tribal governments under Minnesota Statutes, section 145A.14, subdivision 2a; (iv) $1,156,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $1,156,000 in fiscal year 2025 are from the TANF fund for sexual and reproductive health services grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.925; and (v) the commissioner may use up to 6.23 percent of the funds appropriated from the TANF fund each fiscal year to conduct the ongoing evaluations required under Minnesota Statutes, section 145A.17, subdivision 7, and training and technical assistance as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 145A.17, subdivisions 4 and 5. (2) TANF Carryforward. Any unexpended balance of the TANF appropriation in the first year does not cancel but is available in the second year. (rr) Base level adjustments. The general fund base is deleted text begin $197,644,000deleted text end new text begin $193,644,000new text end in fiscal year 2026 and deleted text begin $195,714,000deleted text end new text begin $191,714,000new text end in fiscal year 2027. The health care access fund base is $53,354,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $50,962,000 in fiscal year 2027. Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for a grant program for women's pregnancy centers and maternity homes under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.909. Of these appropriations: new text end new text begin (1) $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for grants to women's pregnancy centers and administration of those grants; and new text end new text begin (2) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for grants to maternity homes and administration of those grants. new text end